Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 4. Funding of Public Assistance and Social Services.

§ 63.2-400.
Local appropriation.

The governing body of each county and city shall each year appropriate sums of money sufficient to provide for the payment of public assistance and to provide social services, including cost of administration, under the provisions of Subtitles II and III of this title, within such county or city. Such governing bodies may also appropriate sums of money sufficient to provide for the full range of public assistance and social services for children and adults as may be required by federal legislation for reimbursement thereunder. The respective governing bodies of the counties and cities shall also appropriate sums of money as shall be sufficient to provide for the foster care of children in the custody or under the supervision of the local boards.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-105; 1956, c. 641; 1958, c. 388; 1968, cc. 578, 666, § 63.1-91; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Counties, § 38.

§ 63.2-401.
Reimbursement of localities by the Commonwealth.

Such funds as are received from the United States and agencies thereof as grants-in-aid for the purpose of providing public assistance and social services grants shall be paid monthly by the Commissioner to each county, city or district fiscal officer as reimbursement of the federal share of such grants as have been paid by each county and city under the provisions of Subtitle II and III of this title. Within the limits of the appropriations of state funds, the Commissioner shall reimburse the entire balance of such public assistance and social services grants as have been paid by each city, county or district fiscal officer after crediting them with the reimbursement made from federal funds. Within the limits of the appropriations of state funds, the Commissioner shall reimburse monthly each city, county or district fiscal officer to the extent of sixty-two and one-half percent of such expenditures made in connection with general relief provided under §

63.2-802

. Within the limits of the appropriations of state funds for the purpose, the Commissioner shall reimburse monthly each city, county or district fiscal officer to the extent of eighty percent of expenditures made for auxiliary grants pursuant to §

51.5-160

. Within the limits of state funds appropriated for the purpose, the Commissioner shall reimburse to each county, city or district fiscal officer an amount not less than fifty percent or more than sixty-two and one-half percent of such expenditures, not federally reimbursable, made for the care of children placed in family homes or institutions pursuant to §§

63.2-900

and

63.2-903

.

Administrative expenditures made by the localities in connection with the providing of public assistance grants, other benefits and related social services, including child welfare pursuant to §

63.2-319

, shall be ascertained by the Board, and the Commissioner shall, within the limits of available federal funds and state appropriations, reimburse monthly each county, city or district fiscal officer therefor out of such federal and state funds in an amount to be determined by the Board not less than fifty percent of such administrative costs.

The Commissioner also shall reimburse monthly, to the extent funds are available for such purpose, each county, city or district fiscal officer out of state and federal funds, to the extent provided in the preceding paragraph, for monthly rental payments for office space provided the local department in publicly owned buildings, for payments that are based on the cost of initial construction or purchase of a building or a reasonable amount for depreciation of such building, and for the cost of repairs and alterations to either a privately or publicly owned building. However, no monthly rental payment shall exceed a reasonable amount as determined by the Commissioner.

Claims for reimbursement shall be presented by the local board to the Commissioner, and shall be itemized and verified in such manner as the Commissioner may require. Such claim shall, upon the approval of the Commissioner, be paid out of funds appropriated by the Commonwealth and funds received from the federal government for the purposes of Subtitles II and III of this title, to the treasurer or other fiscal officer of the county or city. Wherever two or more counties or cities have been combined to form a district pursuant to §

63.2-306

, reimbursements by the Commissioner under this section shall be paid to the district fiscal officer or other person designated to receive such funds by the governing bodies of such counties or cities. The Commonwealth shall reimburse each county and city the full amount of public assistance grants provided for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-106, 63-107; 1956, cc. 608, 623; 1958, c. 519; 1962, c. 297; 1966, cc. 530, 599; 1968, cc. 466, 578, § 63.1-92; 1970, c. 776; 1972, cc. 73, 718; 1973, cc. 201, 264; 1974, cc. 44, 45, 488; 1975, c. 121; 1984, cc. 498, 781; 1985, c. 599; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and updated the section reference in the next-to-last sentence of the first paragraph.

§ 63.2-402.
Reimbursement of the Commonwealth by local board.

If any county or city through its appropriate authorities or officers fails or refuses to provide reimbursement of the Commonwealth, the Board shall authorize and direct the Commissioner to file at the end of each month with the State Comptroller and with the local governing body of such county or city a statement showing all disbursements and expenditures, including administrative expenditures, made for and on behalf of such county or city, and the Comptroller shall from time to time as such funds become available deduct from the funds appropriated by the Commonwealth, in excess of requirements of the Constitution of Virginia, for distribution to such county or city amounts required to reimburse the Commonwealth for expenditures incurred under the provisions of this section. All funds so deducted and transferred are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth, and shall be expended and disbursed as provided in §

63.2-403

. Any county or city may provide such other necessary or incidental social or rehabilitative services as may be authorized by the Board in connection therewith.

History.

1974, c. 488, § 63.1-92.1; 1984, c. 781; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-403.
Expenditures by Department.

Appropriations made to the Department by the General Assembly for carrying out the provisions of Subtitles II and III of this title, including funds received from the United States and other sources for such purpose, shall be used for the following purposes:

Paying such reasonable portion of the per diem and expenses of the members of the Board, the expenses of the Commissioner, the salaries and remuneration of agents and employees of the Board and of the Commissioner, as shall be chargeable for the administration of Subtitles II and III of this title;

Paying all costs and expenses incurred by the Board and the Commissioner in the administration of Subtitles II and III of this title;

Reimbursing the counties and cities to the extent provided in §

63.2-401

;

Paying public assistance to eligible recipients, and expenditures for social services and administration, in the event the Board adopts regulations to provide for state issuance of any or all of such payments;

Paying to the United States, for so long as such payment shall be required as a condition for financial participation by the United States in any public assistance or social services program its proportionate share of the net amounts collected by local boards from recipients and estates of recipients; and

Paying to the Social Security Administration the cost of administering state supplementation of the Supplemental Security Income program if the Commonwealth agrees to such federal administration.

Expenditures and disbursements of all amounts appropriated for the foregoing purposes shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants of the Comptroller issued with the approval of the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-109, 63-111; 1956, c. 608; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-93; 1970, c. 602; 1974, cc. 44, 45, 488, 503; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

§ 63.2-404.
Expenses of Auditor of Public Accounts, Comptroller and State Treasurer.

All expenses incurred by the Auditor of Public Accounts in auditing the books, records and accounts of the Board and the Commissioner, and in rendering other services to them and all expenses incurred by the Comptroller and the State Treasurer in performing the services required by or under Subtitles II and III of this title, may be treated as administrative expenses of the Department, and paid as such.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-112; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-95; 1984, c. 498; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

§ 63.2-405.
Provisions for determination of eligibility for medical care and medical assistance; provision of social services; regulations.

The Commissioner shall, in compliance with the state plan for medical assistance services, applicable regulations of the Board and other state and federal law, provide for the determination of eligibility for medical care and medical assistance and social services required for (i) state participation under Public Law 97 of the 89th Congress of the United States, approved July 30, 1965, as amended, and regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services; and (ii) other state and federal programs. The Commissioner, subject to the state plan for medical assistance services, applicable regulations of the Board and other state and federal law, may establish policies, in the form of guidance documents, necessary to implement such functions, including safeguarding information concerning applicants and recipients. An application for medical assistance services for a person admitted to a State Veterans Care Center located in the Commonwealth may be filed and processed in the jurisdiction where such Care Center is located.

The Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall provide for the determination of eligibility for participation in the Auxiliary Grant Program set forth in Article 9 (§

51.5-159

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 51.5.

History.

1970, c. 721, § 63.1-97.1; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1984, c. 498; 1996, c. 511; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 305; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, effective July 1, 2013, are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; and added subsection B.

§ 63.2-406.
Authority of Board upon amendments of the Social Security Act or regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services.

In the event the Social Security Act or other statutes or regulations adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services are amended to change requirements to entitle the Commonwealth to federal grants or reimbursement for public assistance payments and expenditures for social services, the Board may by regulation adopt such standards, requirements and procedures that would bring the public assistance and social services programs into compliance with the federal requirements so as not to interfere with, diminish or jeopardize the Commonwealth’s entitlement to federal grants or reimbursement for public assistance payments or expenditures for social services.

If federal statutes or regulations are amended to permit funds appropriated by Congress to be used for public assistance to or social services for any persons eligible for assistance under §§

63.2-319

and

63.2-802

, the Board may, pursuant to the provisions of §

63.2-217

, make applicable such provisions of Subtitles II and III of this title as the Board finds necessary to enable the Commonwealth to receive reimbursement for such public assistance and social services. The Board may also by regulation define eligibility within the limitations of §

63.2-802

of persons to receive public assistance or social services under any amendments of the Social Security Act or other statutes. It is the purpose of this section to enable the Commonwealth to meet the requirements for federal reimbursement of public assistance or social services to persons who are eligible for public assistance or social services under Subtitles II and III of this title or who may be eligible under amendments of the Social Security Act.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-220.1; 1950, p. 958; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-98; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

§ 63.2-407.
Necessary or incidental public assistance or social services.

With respect to general relief, foster care for children and auxiliary grants for the aged, disabled or blind, any county or city may provide such other necessary or incidental public assistance or social services as may be authorized by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-135, 63-140.12, 63-157, 63-199; 1960, c. 440; 1962, c. 621; 1966, c. 112; 1968, cc. 578, 668, § 63.1-122; 1970, c. 721; 1974, c. 504; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-408.
When a locality fails to provide public assistance or social services; deductions by Comptroller; social services; withholding payments.

If any county or city, through its appropriate authorities or officers fails or refuses to provide public assistance or social services in accordance with the provisions of Subtitles II and III of this title, the Board through appropriate proceedings shall require such authorities and officers to exercise the powers conferred and perform the duties imposed by Subtitles II and III.

For so long as the failure or refusal to provide for the public assistance or social services continues, the Board shall authorize and direct the Commissioner under regulations of the Board to provide for the payment of public assistance or the furnishing of social services in such county or city out of funds appropriated for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of Subtitles II and III of this title. In such event, the Commissioner shall at the end of each month file with the State Comptroller and with the local governing body of such county or city a statement showing all disbursements and expenditures, including administrative expenditures, made for and on behalf of such county or city, and the Comptroller shall from time to time as such funds become available deduct from funds appropriated by the Commonwealth, in excess of requirements of the Constitution of Virginia, for distribution to such county or city amounts required to reimburse the Commonwealth for expenditures incurred under the provisions of this section. All such funds so deducted and transferred are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth, and shall be expended and disbursed as provided in §

63.2-403

. If at any time a locality fails to operate public assistance programs or social service programs in accordance with state laws or regulations or fails to provide the necessary staff for the implementation of such programs, the Board may authorize and direct the Commissioner, under regulations of the Board, to withhold from such locality the entire reimbursement for administrative expenditures or a part thereof for the period of time the locality fails to comply with state laws or regulations.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-26, 63-135, 63-136, 63-140.12, 63-140.13, 63-157, 63-158, 63-199, 63-200; 1960, c. 440; 1962, c. 621; 1966, c. 112; 1968, cc. 578, 668, 670, §§ 63.1-122, 63.1-123; 1970, c. 721; 1974, cc. 491, 504; 1975, cc. 176, 438; 1984, c. 781; 1990, c. 537; 1995, cc. 770, 818; 1999, c. 854; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

For Subtitle II of this title, see §

63.2-500

et seq. For Subtitle III of this title, see §

63.2-900

et seq.

§ 63.2-409.
No lien to attach to property of applicant or recipient; release of existing unforeclosed liens.

No lien in favor of the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions shall be claimed against, levied or attached to the real or personal property of any applicant for or recipient of public assistance or social services as a condition of eligibility therefor or to recover such aid following the death of such applicant or recipient except applicants for or recipients of long-term care nursing facility benefits paid for by the Department of Medical Assistance Services. However, this section shall not bar any action by the Commonwealth or a local department that seeks reimbursement for part or all of the costs incurred by the Commonwealth or local department for care and maintenance provided to an applicant of the Federal Supplemental Security Income program during the application period when such applicant becomes eligible for the program retroactive to the date of application. In addition, this section shall not be construed to bar any action by the Commonwealth or a local department that seeks reimbursement for public assistance paid through the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families or refugee programs while the family attempts to dispose of real property which together with other resources causes its total resources to be in excess of the state’s allowable reserve.

History.

1970, c. 753, § 63.1-133.1; 1977, c. 83; 1985, c. 293; 1993, cc. 953, 989; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to disregard of amounts received pursuant to an Agent Orange settlement or judgment in determining public assistance, and unavailability
of such amounts from reimbursement to the Commonwealth or any local department, see §

63.2-505

.

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18 Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.01 Exemptions from Executions. Bryson.

§ 63.2-410.
State pool of funds under the Children’s Services Act.

The General Assembly and the governing body of each county and city shall appropriate such sum or sums of money for use by the community policy and management teams through the state pool of funds established in Chapter 52 (§

2.2-5200

et seq.) of Title 2.2 as shall be sufficient to provide basic foster care services for children who are identified as being at risk, as determined by policy developed by the Board, or who are under the custody and control of the local board. The local governing body of each county and city shall appropriate such sums of money as necessary for the purchase of such other essential social services to children and adults under such conditions as may be prescribed by the Board in accordance with federally reimbursed public assistance and social service programs.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-72.1; 1966, c. 593; 1968, cc. 466, 578, § 63.1-55; 1973, c. 122; 1977, c. 634; 1982, c. 171; 1984, c. 781; 1986, c. 281; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 2002, c. 747; 2015, c. 366.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Children’s Services Act” for “Comprehensive Services Act” in the section catchline.

§ 63.2-411.
Construction and operation of children’s residential facilities.

Subject to approval by the Governor, a local board is authorized and empowered (i) to operate, construct, purchase, renovate or enlarge children’s residential facilities for children who are in the custody of such local board by reason of commitment, voluntary entrustment or temporary detention order or (ii) to contract for such services from other counties or cities operating such facilities or from individuals or private corporations whose facilities are licensed by the appropriate state agency. The cost of maintaining children in such facilities through purchase of service contracts shall be established in accordance with regulations of the Board. Any moneys paid by a local board of a county or city to another county or city for services purchased pursuant to this section shall be applied by that county or city to the establishment and operation of such children’s residential facilities. Children’s residential facilities established pursuant to the provisions of this section shall meet standards prescribed by the Board.

Within the limits of appropriations of state funds, the Department shall reimburse the local board one half the actual cost of the construction, purchase, renovation or enlargement of each such facility. The Commonwealth shall reimburse the local board for administrative costs of operations of such facilities, including the entire reasonable cost of food, medicines, disinfectants, beds and bedding, utilities, equipment and service maintenance, transportation, staff salaries and fringe benefits, insurance and other necessary supplies in accordance with the provisions of §

63.2-401

.

In the event that a local board requests and receives financial assistance for the costs of the local share of the construction, purchase, renovation or operation of children’s residential facilities for children who are in the custody of such local board from any source other than reimbursement provided pursuant to this section, the total financial assistance and reimbursement shall not exceed the total cost of construction, purchase, renovation or operations, and such funds shall not be considered state funds.

History.

1973, c. 383, § 63.1-56.1; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 571; 1978, c. 293; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-412.
Assistance to needy persons engaged in work or training programs; costs of administration of such programs.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Commissioner is authorized, subject to the approval of the Board, to initiate and administer a program providing for payments to or in behalf of needy persons engaged in work or training programs. Such payments may be made by transfer of funds to an appropriate agency administering a work or training program. The Commissioner is also authorized to pay all costs incurred in the administration of such programs from funds appropriated for such purposes.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-5.3; 1968, c. 331, § 63.1-5.1; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 21; 2002, c. 747.